Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.802

Transfer of reports, documents, etc., property, funds, assets, appropriations, etc.

All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or other writings relating to the administration of the powers, duties, and functions transferred by this chapter shall be made available to the department and to the state actuary.

All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed in carrying out the powers, duties, and functions transferred by this chapter shall be made available to the department.

All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with powers, duties, and functions transferred by this chapter shall be assigned to the department.

Any appropriations made to any committee, division, board, or any other state agency for the purpose of carrying out the powers, duties, and functions transferred by this chapter shall, in the manner prescribed by the director of financial management, be transferred and credited to the department for the purpose of carrying out such transferred powers, duties, and functions.

[ 1979 c 151 s 65; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 105 s 15.]